apertium-ton.ton.twol
Alphabet
 A E F H I K L M N Ŋ O P S T U V ʻ
 a e f h i k l m n ŋ o p s t u v ʻ
 %{A%}:a
 %>:0
 %{S%}:siʻ
 %{S%}:h
 ;

Sets

Vowel = A Ā E Ē I Ī Ō U Ū
        a ā e ē i ī ō u ū;

Rules

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

!Vx:Vy <=> _ %> :%{´%} ;
!  Vx in (a e i o u)
!  Vy in (á é í ó ú)
!  matched ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
